Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 8. Vermont Pharmaceutical Assistance Programs

§ 2071.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Individual with disabilities” means an individual who is under age 65 and is entitled, under the Social Security Act, to disability insurance benefits or is eligible for Medicare.

“Maintenance drug” means a drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for continuous use and prescribed to treat a chronic condition for a prolonged period of time of 30 days or longer and includes insulin, an insulin syringe, and an insulin needle.

“Medicare Part D” means the prescription drug program established under the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement and Modernization Act of 2003, Pub. L. No. 108-173, including the prescription drug plans offered pursuant to the act.

“DVHA” means the Department of Vermont Health Access.

“Pharmaceutical” means a drug that may not be dispensed unless prescribed by a health care provider as defined by

18 V.S.A. § 9402(7)

acting within the scope of the provider’s license. The term excludes a drug determined less than effective under the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetics Act.

“Pharmacy” means a retail or institutional drug outlet licensed by the Vermont State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 36, or by an equivalent board in another state, in which pharmaceuticals are sold at retail and that has entered into a written agreement with the State to dispense pharmaceuticals in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314; amended

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.70;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 2072.
General eligibility.

An individual shall be eligible for assistance under this subchapter if the individual:

is a resident of Vermont at the time of application for benefits;

is at least 65 years of age or is an individual with disabilities as defined in subdivision 2071(1) of this title; and

has a household income, when calculated using modified adjusted gross income as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 36B(d)(2)(B), no greater than 225 percent of the federal poverty level.

An individual whose pharmaceutical expenses are paid or reimbursable, either in whole or in part, by any plan of assistance or insurance, other than Title XVIII (Medicare) and Title XIX (Medicaid) of the Social Security Act, shall not be eligible for pharmaceutical assistance under this subchapter. No assistance shall be provided under this subchapter with respect to an individual pharmaceutical purchase that may be covered in whole by Title XVIII.

If an individual becomes ineligible for assistance under this subchapter, the Secretary shall terminate assistance to the individual.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314; amended

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § E.309;

2013, No. 79

, § 32, eff. Jan. 1, 2014.

§ 2073.
VPharm assistance program.

Subsection (a) contingently effective until the later of January 1, 2022 or federal approval of VPharm coverage expansion; see also subsection (a) contingently effective on the later of January 1, 2022 or federal approval of VPharm coverage expansion set out below.

Effective January 1, 2006, the VPharm program is established as a State pharmaceutical assistance program to provide supplemental pharmaceutical coverage to Medicare beneficiaries. The supplemental coverage under subsection (c) of this section shall provide only the same pharmaceutical coverage as the Medicaid program to enrolled individuals whose income is not greater than 150 percent of the federal poverty guidelines and only coverage for maintenance drugs for enrolled individuals whose income is greater than 150 percent and no greater than 225 percent of the federal poverty guidelines.

(a)

Subsection (a) contingently effective January 1, 2022 or federal approval of VPharm coverage expansion; see also subsection (a) contingently effective until the later of January 1, 2022 or federal approval of VPharm coverage expansion set out above.

The VPharm program is established as a State pharmaceutical assistance program to provide supplemental pharmaceutical coverage to Medicare beneficiaries. The supplemental coverage under subsection (c) of this section shall provide the same pharmaceutical coverage as the Medicaid program to enrolled individuals whose income is not greater than 225 percent of the federal poverty guidelines.

Subsection (b) contingently effective until the later of January 1, 2022 or federal approval of VPharm coverage expansion; see also subsection (b) contingently effective on the later of January 1, 2022 or federal approval of VPharm coverage expansion set out below.

Any individual with income no greater than 225 percent of the federal poverty guidelines participating in Medicare Part D, having secured the low income subsidy if the individual is eligible and meeting the general eligibility requirements established in section 2072 of this title, shall be eligible for VPharm.

(b)

Subsection (b) contingently effective on the later of January 1, 2022 or federal approval of VPharm coverage expansion; see also subsection (b) contingently effective until the later of January 1, 2022 or federal approval of VPharm coverage expansion set out above.

Any individual with income not greater than 225 percent of the federal poverty guidelines participating in Medicare Part D, having secured the low-income subsidy if the individual is eligible and meeting the general eligibility requirements established in section 2072 of this title, shall be eligible for VPharm.

VPharm shall provide supplemental benefits by paying or subsidizing:

The actual Medicare Part D premium for the standard prescription drug benefit offered by Medicare Part D prescription drug programs, except for any late enrollment penalties, provided that DVHA may pay or subsidize a higher premium for a Medicare Part D prescription drug plan offering expanded benefits if it is cost-effective to do so.

Any other cost-sharing required by Medicare Part D, except for co-payments for individuals eligible for Medicaid and as provided for in subdivision (d)(1) of this section.

The following pharmaceuticals if they are not covered by the individual’s Medicare Part D prescription drug plan: pharmaceuticals or classes of pharmaceuticals, or their medical uses, which may be excluded from coverage or otherwise restricted under Medicaid under Section 1927(d)(2) or (3) of the Social Security Act.

Pharmaceuticals that are not covered after the individual has exhausted the Medicare Part D prescription drug plan’s appeal process or the prescription drug plan’s transition plan approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and that are deemed medically necessary by the individual’s prescriber in a manner established by the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access. The coverage decision under this subdivision shall not be subject to the exceptions process established under Medicaid. An individual may appeal to the Human Services Board or pursue any other remedies provided by law.

An individual shall contribute a co-payment of $1.00 for prescriptions where the cost-sharing amount required by Medicare Part D is less than $30.00, and a co-payment of $2.00 for prescriptions where the cost-sharing amount required by Medicare Part D is $30.00 or more. A pharmacy may not refuse to dispense a prescription to an individual who does not provide the co-payment.
(d) (1) An individual shall contribute a co-payment of $1.00 for prescriptions where the cost-sharing amount required by Medicare Part D is less than $30.00, and a co-payment of $2.00 for prescriptions where the cost-sharing amount required by Medicare Part D is $30.00 or more. A pharmacy may not refuse to dispense a prescription to an individual who does not provide the co-payment.

An individual shall contribute the following base cost-sharing amounts that shall be indexed to the increases established under 42 C.F.R. § 423.104(d)(5)(iv) and then rounded to the nearest dollar amount:

in the case of recipients whose household income is no greater than 150 percent of the federal poverty level, such premium shall be $15.00 per month;

in the case of recipients whose household income is greater than 150 percent of the federal poverty level and no greater than 175 percent of the federal poverty level, the premium shall be $20.00 per month; and

in the case of recipients whose household income is greater than 175 percent of the federal poverty level and no greater than 225 percent of the federal poverty level, the premium shall be $50.00 per month.

In order to ensure the appropriate payment of claims, DVHA may expand the Medicare advocacy program established under chapter 67 of this title to individuals receiving benefits from the VPharm program.

A manufacturer of pharmaceuticals purchased by individuals receiving assistance from VPharm established under this section shall pay to DVHA, as required by section 1901 of this title, a rebate on all pharmaceutical claims for which State-only funds are expended in an amount that is in proportion to the State share of the total cost of the claim, as calculated annually on an aggregate basis, and based on the full Medicaid rebate amount as provided for in Section 1927(a) through (c) of the federal Social Security Act,

42 U.S.C. § 1396r

-8.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314; amended

2007, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 11a;

2007, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.017;

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), §§ E.309.6, E.309.7;

2009, No. 1

56

(Adj. Sess.), § E.309.16, eff. June 3, 2010;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), §§ E.309.9, I.71;

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), §§ E.307, E.307.7;

2019, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 2074.
Repealed. 2013, No. 79, § 52(d), effective January 1, 2014.

§ 2075.
Assistance in enrolling in Medicare Part D.

The Agency of Human Services may act, if permissible under federal law, as an individual’s agent to enroll the individual in a Medicare Part D prescription drug plan and a low-income subsidy if the individual has not enrolled prior to the application for VPharm. The Agency shall provide applicants for VPharm with information on Medicare Part D and the low-income subsidy if applicable, and on how to obtain assistance in enrolling in Medicare Part D or the subsidy.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314.

§ 2076.
Over-the-counter and generic medications.

All public pharmaceutical assistance programs shall provide coverage for those over-the-counter pharmaceuticals on the preferred drug list developed under section 1998 of this title, provided the pharmaceuticals are authorized as part of the medical treatment of a specific disease or condition, and they are a less costly, medically appropriate substitute for currently covered pharmaceuticals.

All public pharmaceutical assistance programs shall comply with the provisions regarding generic drugs established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 91.

DVHA shall seek any waivers of federal law, rule, or regulation necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314; amended

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.73.

§ 2077.
Administration.

The programs established under this subchapter shall be designed to provide maximum access to program participants, to incorporate mechanisms that are easily understood and require minimum effort for applicants and health care providers, and to promote quality, efficiency, and effectiveness through cost controls and utilization review. Applications may be filed at any time and shall be reviewed annually. DVHA may contract with a fiscal agent for the purpose of processing claims and performing related functions required in the administration of the pharmaceutical programs established under this subchapter.

Upon determining that an applicant is eligible under this subchapter, DVHA shall issue an identification card to the applicant.

A pharmacy that dispenses a pharmaceutical to an individual eligible for a pharmaceutical program established under this subchapter shall collect payment for the pharmaceutical from DVHA.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314; amended

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § E.309.1;

2009, No. 1

56

(Adj. Sess.), § I.74.

§ 2078.
Education and outreach.

The Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living shall conduct ongoing education and outreach to inform Vermonters who are elders and Vermonters with disabilities of the benefits they may be entitled to pursuant to this subchapter, make available information concerning pharmaceutical assistance programs, and minimize any confusion and duplication of pharmaceutical coverage resulting from a multiplicity of pharmaceutical programs.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 211.

§ 2079.
Construction.

The benefits provided by the pharmaceutical assistance programs established under this subchapter constitute medical services for purposes of section 141 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314.

§ 2080.
Vermont Prescription Drug Pricing and Consumer Protection Program.

The Secretary of Human Services shall administer this subchapter in conformity with the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program established under subchapter 5 of this chapter to enable the citizens of Vermont to purchase necessary prescription pharmaceuticals at the lowest possible price, to ensure access to such pharmaceuticals, and to support Vermont pharmacies, consistent with the time frames, standards, and procedures established by the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314.

§ 2081.
Rules and legislative oversight.

The Agency of Human Services shall adopt rules necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this subchapter, including standards and schedules establishing coverage and exclusion of pharmaceuticals and maximum quantities of pharmaceuticals to be dispensed, and to comply with the requirements of the Medicare Modernization Act. The Agency of Human Services shall submit the proposed rule to the Health Care Oversight Committee. The Health Care Oversight Committee shall review and advise on the Agency rules and policies developed under this subsection and shall submit for consideration any recommendations to the joint Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules.

DVHA shall report on the status of the pharmaceutical assistance programs established by this subchapter to the Health Care Oversight Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 314; amended

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.75;

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 41c.